ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티: 눈사태 안전장비; 스키/스노보드; 썰매 액세서리; 썰매; 스노슈잉; 겨울 트레일 지도 및 가이드
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動: 雪崩安全用品; 單/雙板滑雪; 雪橇配件; 雪橇; 雪鞋健行; 冬季步道地圖與指南
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter: Lavinsäkerhet; Skid- och snowboardåkning; Tillbehör för slädar och kälkar; Slädar; Snöskogång; Kartor och guider för vinterleder
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter: Skredsikring; Ski- og snowboardutstyr; Tilbehør til kjelker; Sleder; Truging; Løypekart og guider for vinterbruk
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă: Siguranță în caz de avalanșă; Schi și snowboarding; Accesorii pentru sănii; Sănii; Plimbări cu rachete de zăpadă; Hărți și ghiduri pentru trasee de iarnă
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti: Sigurnost od snježnih lavina; Skijanje i snowboardanje; Dodaci za sanjke; Saonice; Krpljanje; Zimske karte i vodiči za staze
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten: Lawineveiligheid; Skiën en snowboarden; Accessoires voor sleeën; Sleetjes en sleden; Op sneeuwschoenen lopen; Winterwandelkaarten en -gidsen
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες: Ασφάλεια χιονοστιβάδας; Σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Αξεσουάρ ελκήθρων; Έλκηθρα; Περπάτημα σε χιονισμένες επιφάνειες με χιονοπέδιλα; Χάρτες και οδηγοί χειμερινών διαδρομών
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông: An toàn khi tuyết lở; Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết; Phụ kiện xe trượt tuyết; Xe trượt tuyết; Giày đi tuyết; Bản đồ và hướng dẫn đường mòn mùa đông
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri: Çığ Güvenliği; Kayak ve Snowboard; Kızak aksesuarları; Kızaklar; Kar Ayakkabılı Yürüyüş Sporu; Kış rotası haritaları ve rehberleri
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver: Sécurité anti-avalanche; Ski et snowboard; Accessoires de luges; Traîneaux; Raquette à neige; Cartes et guides des pistes d’hiver
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры: Спасательные работы при сходе лавин; Лыжный спорт и сноубординг; Аксессуары для саней; Сани; Прогулки на снегоступах; Карты и путеводители по зимним маршрутам
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset: Lumivyöryturvallisuus; Hiihto ja lumilautailu; Kelkkojen lisävarusteet; Kelkat; Lumikenkäily; Talvireittikartat ja -oppaat
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno: Segurança contra avalanches; Esqui e snowboarding; Acessórios para trenós; Trenós; Caminhadas com raquetes de neve; Guias e mapas de trilhas de inverno
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动: 雪崩安全用品; 滑雪与单板滑雪; 雪橇配件; 雪橇; 雪鞋健行; 冬季步道地图和指南
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek: Lavinabiztonság; Síelés és snowboardozás; Szánkókiegészítők; Szánkók; Hócipőzés; Téli turistatérképek és útmutatók
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali: Sistemi di sicurezza antivalanga; Sci e snowboard; Accessori per slitte; Slitte; Snowshoeing; Mappe e guide dei sentieri invernali
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว: ความปลอดภัยจากหิมะถล่ม; สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเลื่อนหิมะ; เลื่อนหิมะ; การเดินบนหิมะ; แผนที่เส้นทางและคู่มือเที่ยวฤดูหนาว
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity: Lavínová bezpečnosť; Lyžovanie a snowboarding; Príslušenstvo pre sane; Sánky; Snežnice; Zimné mapy a sprievodcovia
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities: Avalanche Safety; Skiing & Snowboarding; Sled Accessories; Sleds; Snowshoeing; Winter Trail Maps & Guides
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности: Лавинна безопасност; Каране на ски и сноуборд; Аксесоари за шейни; Шейни; Обувки за сняг; Карти и ръководства за зимни пътеки
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti: Zaščita pred snežnimi plazovi; Smučanje in deskanje na snegu; Dodatki za sani; Sani; Krpljanje; Zemljevidi in vodniki za zimske ture
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno: Seguridad frente a avalanchas; Esquí y snowboard; Accesorios para trineos; Trineos; Caminar con raquetas de nieve; Mapas y guías de senderos de invierno
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity: Bezpečnostní vybavení proti lavinám; Lyžování a snowboarding; Příslušenství k saním a bobům; Sáňky; Chůze se sněžnicemi; Mapy a průvodci zimními trasami
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter: Lavinesikkerhed; Ski og snowboard; Tilbehør til kælke; Slæder; Sneskovandring; Vinterrutekort og guider
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą: Zabezpieczenia lawinowe; Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie; Akcesoria do sanek; Sanki; Chodzenie z rakietami śnieżnymi; Zimowe mapy tras i przewodniki
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno: Segurança contra avalanche; Esqui e snowboard; Acessórios para trenós; Trenós; Caminhada com raquetes de neve; Mapas e guias de trilhos de inverno
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ: 雪崩対策; スキー・スノーボード用品; ソリ用アクセサリー; そり; スノーシュー用品; 冬季トレイルマップ・ガイド
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla: Lavininė sauga; Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas; Rogių priedai; Rogutes; Vaikščiojimas su sniegbačiais; Žiemos takų žemėlapiai ir vadovai
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten: Lawinenschutz; Skisport & Snowboarden; Zubehör für Schlitten; Rodelschlitten; Schneeschuhe & Zubehör; Winter-Wanderkarten & Reiseführer